Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 690.11 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Grants for Recovering,
Improving, and Thriving economies program (GRIT). This program
shall be administered by the Oklahoma Department of Emergency
Req. No. 12363 Page 1

Mana gement. This program shall be for political subdivisions, with
populations less than six thousand (6000) people who are directly
impacted by events attributing to a Federal Emergency Management
Agency (FEMA) declared emergency or disasters. These political
subdivisions may apply for a GRIT grant if they are unable to
provide the full local match required under the relevant FEMA
recovery program. The Department shall promulgate rules to
administer the grant program.
SECTION 2. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management
to be designated the "Grants for Recovering, Improving, and Thriving
Economies Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies
received by the Department from appropriations. All monies accruing
to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be
budgeted and expended by the Department for the purpose of Grants
for Recovering, Improving, and Thriving economies program described
in Section 1 of this act. Expenditures from said fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12363 MKS 02/10/25
Req. No. 12363 Page 2

























Req. No. 12363 Page 3